Oklahoma, session 2026, SB23.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1248 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Marijuana” shall have the same meaning as provided in
Section 2-101 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Motor vehicle” shall have the same meaning as provided in
Section 1-134 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
3. “Vapor products” shall have the same meaning as provided in
Section 1-229.12 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB23 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly smoke
tobacco or marijuana or use a vapor product in a motor vehicle while
in the presence of a minor. Any person in violation of the
provisions of this section shall be assessed a fine not less than
Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)
which shall be deposited into the Tobacco Prevention and Cessation
Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 1-105d of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB23 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)